Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 93

GOVERNMENT
PUBLICATIONS

Part I. State Publications Distribution
Center

Section

93-1 Establishment of state publications
distribution

center

93-2 Definitions

93-3 Deposit of publications

93-4 Depository library system

93-4.5 Notification when electronic publications
posted

93-5 Repealed

Part II. Publications; Specific Provisions

93-11 Disposition of statutes and court reports

93-12 Annual reports

93-15 Legislative journals; sale and
distribution

93-16 Publication and distribution of reports

Cross References

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next